apertium-zul.zul.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Zulu

# Part of speech categories
# <n>      # Noun
# <v>      # Verb
# <adj>    # Adjective
# <prn>    # Pronoun
# <det>    # Determiner

# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   # Right parenthesis

# Number morphology
# <pl>  # Plural
# <sg>  # Singular

# Other symbols
# >      # Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS
Conjunction
Noun
Punctuation
Verb
DemPronoun
PersPronoun
Adverb
IrrAdverb
Adjective
Quant
Possessive
Copula
Location

PATTERN Noun
(:CConj? :NounPrefix NounRoot [<n>:] NounPrefix:)[^[c1-2,c3-4,c5-6,c7-8,c9-10,c11,c14,c15,c17]]

LEXICON CConj
na<cconj>:na>

LEXICON NounPrefix
um<cl1_2><sg>:um{u}>[c1-2]
ab<cl1_2><pl>:ab{a}>[c1-2]
um<cl3_4><sg>:um{u}>[c3-4]
imi<cl3_4><pl>:imi>[c3-4]
i<cl5_6><sg>:i>[c5-6]
ama<cl5_6><pl>:ama>[c5-6]
isi<cl7_8><sg>:isi>[c7-8]
izi<cl7_8><pl>:izi>[c7-8]
i<cl9_10><sg>:i{n}>[c9-10]
izi<cl9_10><pl>:izi{n}[c9-10]
u<cl11_10><sg>:u>[c11]
ubu<cl14><sp>:ubu>[c14]
uku<cl15><sp>:uku>[c15]
uku<cl17><sp>:uku>[c17]

PATTERN Copula
Cop Noun

LEXICON Cop
y<cop>:y>
ng<cop>:ng> 

PATTERN Location
Loc Noun

LEXICON Loc
kwa<loc>:kwa>
e<loc>:e>

PATTERN Adjective
AdjPrefix AdjRoot

LEXICON AdjPrefix
omu<cl1_2><sg>:omu>
aba<cl1_2><pl>:aba>
omu<cl3_4><sg>:omu>
emi<cl3_4><pl>:emi>
eli<cl5_6><sg>:eli>
ama<cl5_6><pl>:ama>
esi<cl7_8><sg>:esi>
ezi<cl7_8><pl>:ezi{n}>
en<cl9_10><sg>:en>
ezi<cl9_10><pl>:ezi{n}>
olu<cl11_10><sg>:olu>
obu<cl14><sp>:obu>
oku<cl15><sp>:oku>
oku<cl17><sp>:oku>

#PATTERN Determiner
#Possessive
#Quant

PATTERN Adverb
(AdvPrefix (PersPro|AdjRoot|Noun)) | (AdvRoot) [<adv>:]

#PATTERN IrrAdverb
#IrrAdverb

LEXICON AdvPrefix
:ka>
:nga>
:na>

PATTERN Possessive
ObjAgr PosRoot 

PATTERN Quant
NAgr QuantRoot

LEXICON NAgr
nge<pers><p1><sg>:nge>
so<pers><p1><pl>:so>
we<pers><p2><sg>:we>
no<pers><p2><pl>:no>
ye<pers><p3><sg>:ye>
bo<pers><p3><pl>:bo>
ye<pers><cl1><sg>:ye>
bo<pers><cl2>:bo>
ye<pers><cl1a>:ye>
bo<pers><cl2a>:bo>
wo<pers><cl3>:wo>
yo<pers><cl4>:yo>
lo<pers><cl5>:lo>
wo<pers><cl6>:wo>
so<pers><cl7>:so>
zo<pers><cl8>:zo>
yo<pers><cl9>:yo>
zo<pers><cl10>:zo>
lo<pers><cl11>:lo>
bo<pers><cl14>:bo>
ko<pers><cl15>:ko>
ko<pers><cl17>:ko>

LEXICON ObjAgr
wa<oa_sg3>:wa>
ba<oa_pl3>:ba>
wa<oa_sg1_2>:wa>
ba<oa_pl1_2>:ba>
wa<oa_sg1a_2a>:wa>
ba<oa_pl1a_2a>:ba>
wa<oa_sg3_4>:wa>
ya<oa_pl3_4>:ya>
la<oa_sg5_6>:la>
a<oa_pl5_6>:a>
sa<oa_sg7_8>:sa>
za<oa_pl7_8>:za>
ya<oa_sg9_10>:ya>
za<oa_pl9_10>:za>
lwa<oa_sg11_10>:lwa>
ba<oa_sp14>:ba>
kwa<oa_sp15>:kwa>
kwa<oa_sp17>:kwa>

PATTERN Verb
TensedVerb

PATTERN TensedVerb
:Tense(1) SubjConcord Tense(2) Mood? ObjConcord? VerbRoot [<v>:] Tense(1): :Tense(3)

LEXICON SubjConcord
ngi<s_sg1>:ngi>
si<s_pl1>:si>
u<s_sg2>:{w}u>
ni<s_pl2>:ni>
u<s_sg3>:{w}u>
ba<s_pl3>:ba>
u<s_sg1_2>:{k}{u}>
ba<s_pl1_2>:ba>
u<s_sg1a_2a>:{k}{u}>
o<s_pl1a_2a>:o>
u<s_sg3_4>:{w}u>
i<s_pl2_4>:{y}i>
li<s_sg5_6>:li>
a<s_pl5_6>:a>
si<s_sg7_8>:si>
zi<s_pl7_8>:zi>
i<s_sg9-10>:{y}i>
zi<s_pl9_10>:zi>
lu<s_sg11_10>:lu>
bu<s_sp14>:bu>
ku<s_sp15>:ku>
ku<s_sp17>:ku>

LEXICON ObjConcord
ngi<o_sg1>:ngi>
si<o_pl1>:si>
ku<o_sg2>:ku>
ni<o_pl2>:ni>
m<o_sg3>:m>
ba<o_pl3>:ba>
m<o_sg><cl1_2>:m>
ba<o_pl><cl1_2>:ba>
m<o_sg><cl1a_2a>:m>
ba<o_pl><cl1a_2a>:ba>
wu<o_sg><cl3_4>:wu>
yi<o_pl><cl3_4>:yi>
li<o_sg><cl5_6>:li>
wa<o_pl><cl5_6>:wa>
si<o_sg><cl7_8>:si>
zi<o_pl><cl7_8>:zi>
yi<o_sg><cl9_10>:yi>
zi<o_pl><cl9_10>:zi>
lu<o_sg><cl11_10>:lu>
bu<o_sp><cl14>:bu>
ku<o_sp><cl15>:ku>
ku<o_sp><cl17>:ku>

LEXICON Tense(3)
<pres><neg>:a> : :>i
<past><neg>:a> : :>anga
<past><cont>:be> : :>a
<past><cont><neg>:be> : :>i
<past><perf>:be> : :>e
<past><perf><neg>:be> : :>anga
<past>: : :>e
<past>: : :>ile #Dir/LR
<pres>: : :>a
<rm_past><cont>:nga> : :>a
<rm_past><perf>:nga> : :>e
<rm_past>: :a> :>a

LEXICON Mood
nga<prs>:nga>
ya<foc>:ya>
nga<participle><neg>:nga>
nga<pres><neg>:nga>
nga<past><cont><neg>:nga>
zo<fut>:zo>

PATTERN DemPronoun
ProAgr Distance

LEXICON ProAgr
lo<cl1>:lo>
lo<cl1a>:lo>
la<cl2>:la>
la<cl2a>:la>
lo<cl3>:lo>
le<cl4>:le>
le<cl5>:le>
la<cl6>:la>
le<cl7>:le>
le<cl8>:le>
le<cl9>:le>
le<cl10>:le>
lo<cl11>:lo>
lo<cl14>:lo>
lo<cl15>:lo>
lo<cl17>:lo>

LEXICON Distance
<prn><dst><0><cl1>: #"this"
<prn><dst><0><cl1a>: #"this"
ba<prn><dst><0><cl2>:>ba #"this"
ba<prn><dst><0><cl2a>:>ba #"this"
<prn><dst><0><cl3>: #"this"
<prn><dst><0><cl4>: #"this"
li<prn><dst><0><cl5>:>li #"this"
<prn><dst><0><cl6>: #"this"
si<prn><dst><0><cl7>:>si #"this"
zi<prn><dst><0><cl8>:>zi #"this"
<prn><dst><0><cl9>: #"this"
zi<prn><dst><0><cl10>:>zi #"this"
lu<prn><dst><0><cl11>:>lu #"this"
bu<prn><dst><0><cl14>:>bu #"this"
khu<prn><dst><0><cl15>:>khu #"this"
khu<prn><dst><0><cl17>:>khu #"this"
wo<prn><dst><1><cl1><sg>:>wo #"that"
wo<prn><dst><1><cl1a>:>wo #"that"
bo<prn><dst><1><cl2>:>bo #"that"
bo<prn><dst><1><cl2a>:>bo #"that"
wo<prn><dst><1><cl3>:>wo #"that"
yo<prn><dst><1><cl4>:>yo #"that"
lo<prn><dst><1><cl5>:>lo #"that"
wo<prn><dst><1><cl6>:>wo #"that"
so<prn><dst><1><cl7>:>so #"that"
zo<prn><dst><1><cl8>:>zo #"that"
yo<prn><dst><1><cl9>:>yo #"that"
zo<prn><dst><1><cl10>:>zo #"that"
lo<prn><dst><1><cl11>:>lo #"that"
bo<prn><dst><1><cl14>:>bo #"that"
kho<prn><dst><1><cl15>:>kho #"that"
kho<prn><dst><1><cl17>:>kho #"that"


PATTERN PersPronoun
PersPro Demo

LEXICON PersPro
mi<px1sg>:mi>
thi<px1pl>:thi>
we<px2sg>:we>
ni<px2pl>:ni>
ye<px3sg>:ye>
bo<px3pl>:bo>
ye<px1_2sg>:ye>
bo<px1_2pl>:bo>
ye<px1a_2asg>:ye>
bo<px1a_2apl>:bo>
wo<px3_4sg>:wo>
yo<px3_4pl>:yo>
lo<px5_6sg>:lo>
wo<px5_6pl>:wo>
so<px7_8sg>:so>
zo<px7_8pl>:zo>
yo<px9_10sg>:yo>
zo<px9_10pl>:zo>
lo<px11_10sg>:lo>
bo<px14sp>:bo>
kho<px15sp>:kho>
kho<px17sp>:kho>

LEXICON Demo
na<prn><dem>:na

###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################

LEXICON Conjunction
ukuthi<cnjsub>:ukuthi
uma<cnjsub>:uma
ngoba<cnjsub>:ngoba
lapho<cnjsub>:lapho
ukuba<cnjsub>:ukuba
khona<cnjsub>:khona
futhi<cnjcoo>:futhi
noma<cnjcoo>:noma
kodwa<cnjcoo>:kodwa
lapha<cnjsub>:lapha
kanye<cnjsub>:kanye
kanti<cnjsub>:kanti
ke<cnjsub>:ke
njengoba<cnjcoo>:njengoba
bese<cnjcoo>:bese

LEXICON IrrAdverb
#kahle<adv>:kahle
nje<adv>:nje
ngakho-ke<adv>:ngakho-ke
ngakho-ke<adv>:ngakhoke # Dir/LR
manje<adv>:manje
#kakhulu<adv>:kakhulu
phansi<adv>:phansi
ngaphansi<adv>:ngaphansi
phela<adv>:phela
sengathi<adv>:sengathi
njalo<adv>:njalo
kanjani<adv>:kanjani

LEXICON QuantRoot
nke
dwa

LEXICON PosRoot
mi<s_p1><s_sg>:mi
ithu<s_p1><s_pl>:ithu
kho<s_p2><s_sg>:kho
inu<s_p2><s_pl>:inu
khe<s_p3><s_sg>:khe
bo<s_p3><s_pl>:bo
khe<s_cl1-2><s_sg>:khe
bo<s_cl1-2><s_pl>:bo
khe<s_cl1-2a><s_sg>:khe
bo<s_cl1-2a><s_pl>:bo
wo<s_cl3-4><s_sg>:wo
yo<s_cl3-4><s_pl>:yo
lo<s_cl5-6><s_sg>:lo
wo<s_cl5-6><s_pl>:wo
so<s_cl7-8><s_sg>:so
zo<s_cl7-8><s_pl>:zo
yo<s_cl9-10><s_sg>:yo
zo<s_cl9-10><s_pl>:zo
lo<s_cl11-10><s_sg>:lo
zo<s_cl11-10><s_pl>:zo
bo<s_cl14><s_sg>:bo
kho<s_cl15><s_sg>:kho
kho<s_cl17><s_sg>:kho

LEXICON AdjRoot
hle # "good"
bi # "bad"
khulu # "big"
ncane # "small"
de # "tall/long"
fushane # "short"
seduze # "near"
ningi # "many"
dala # "old"
ningana # "quite a few"

LEXICON AdvRoot
phansi #below
phezulu #above
mhlawumbe #maybe
phezu #on top
ngeke #never

#ALIAS AdjRoot AdvRoot
